Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7847.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6-13 of the General Laws entitled "Unfair Sales Practices" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-13-12.2. Airline tickets -- Flight vouchers.
(a) "Airline ticket" or "flight voucher" means a record evidencing a promise, made for
monetary or other consideration, by the seller or issuer of record that air travel services will be
provided to the owner of record for the value shown in the record and includes, but is not limited
to:
(1) A record that contains a microprocessor chip, magnetic strip, or other means of storage
of information that is pre-funded and for which the value is decremented upon each use;
(2) An airline ticket;
(3) A flight voucher; or
(4) A similar record or card.
(b) Any airline company, or corporation (airline) or travel agency that sells airline tickets
or vouchers shall be required to record the sales and keep an accurate and complete record of each
airline ticket or flight voucher issued. The record shall include the date of issue; the full value of
the airline ticket or flight voucher; and the identification number assigned by the airline to the
airline ticket or flight voucher.
(c) It shall be unlawful for any airline or travel agency of any kind to charge any surcharge

or additional service or maintenance fee on airline tickets or flight vouchers or to limit the time for
the redemption of airline tickets or flight vouchers or to place an expiration date upon airline tickets
or flight vouchers. No airline ticket, flight voucher or any agreement shall contain language
suggesting that an expiration date may apply to the airline ticket or flight voucher. Any airline or
travel agency that shall violate the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more
than two hundred dollars ($200).
(d) This section shall not apply to airline tickets or flight vouchers that are distributed to a
traveler pursuant to an awards, loyalty, or promotional program without any money or other thing
of value being given in exchange for the airline ticket or flight voucher. Any restrictions or
limitations that such airline ticket or flight voucher may be subject to shall be disclosed to the
traveler, in writing, at the time the airline ticket or flight voucher are issued to the traveler.
(e) This section shall not prohibit airlines and travel agencies from refunding any unused
portion of an airline ticket or flight voucher that is issued.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005791
========
LC005791 - Page 2 of 3